Nebraska, session 109, LB644A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $30,000 from the State
Settlement Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $-0- from the State Settlement Cash
Fund for FY2026-27 to the Attorney General, for Program 507, to aid in carrying
out the provisions of Legislative Bill 644, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
First Session, 2025.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $50,000 from the General Fund for
FY2025-26 and (2) $50,000 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the Nebraska
Accountability and Disclosure Commission, for Program 94, to aid in carrying
out the provisions of Legislative Bill 644, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
First Session, 2025.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-